District of Columbia statutes.
4-205.01

Eligibility for public assistance.

(a)

Public assistance may be awarded to, or on behalf of, any needy individual who is eligible for one of the categories of public assistance established by subchapter II.

(b)

Notwithstanding any other provision of this subchapter, no person shall be rendered ineligible for public assistance by reason of a civil violation of § 48-1201.

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-101, § 501, 29 DCR 1060
Oct. 27, 1995, D.C. Law 11-72, § 201(a), 42 DCR 4728
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-241, § 2(h), 46 DCR 905
July 17, 2014, D.C. Law 20-126, § 402, 61 DCR 3482

History

1981 Ed., § 3-205.1.

Prior Codifications

The 2014 amendment by D.C. Law 20-126 added (b).

Effect of Amendments

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(d) of Public Assistance Temporary Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Law 12-7, August 1, 1997, law notification 44 DCR 4639).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(d) of Public Assistance Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-130, July 24, 1998, law notification 45 DCR 6501).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(h) of Self-Sufficiency Promotion Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-230, April 20, 1999, law notification 46 DCR 4143).

Temporary Legislation

For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(d) of the Public Assistance Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-25, February 27, 1997, 44 DCR 1778), and § 2(d) of the Public Assistance Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-77, May 27, 1997, 44 DCR 3181).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(d) of the Public Assistance Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-306, March 20, 1998, 45 DCR 1900).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(h) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-372, June 9, 1998, 45 DCR 4270), § 2(h) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-425, July 31, 1998, 45 DCR 5682),§ 2(h) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-552, December 24, 1998, 46 DCR 521), and § 2(h) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-19, February 17, 1999, 46 DCR 2492).

Emergency Legislation

Expiration of Law

Expiration of Law 11-72

Section 401 of D.C. Law 11-72 provided that the act shall expire 5 years from the date of implementation of an approved federal waiver and rules promulgated by the Mayor.

Delegation of authority pursuant to D.C. Law 12-372, the “Self-Sufficiency Promotion Emergency Amendment Act of 1998”, see Mayor’s Order 98-143, August 25, 1998 ( 45 DCR 6596).

Delegation of Authority

Editor's Notes

Entitlement to public assistance: Section 10 of D.C. Law 9-271 provided that notwithstanding subchapter V of Chapter 2 of Title 4, medical and geriatric parolees shall be entitled to general public assistance pending their application for eligibility.

Section 501 of D.C. Law 20–126 provided that the Mayor, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2 [§ 2-501 et seq.], may issue rules to implement the provisions of the act.